Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1524
Consultation with otolaryngologist or physician; when advised.

A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall advise a prospective hearing instrument user to consult promptly with an otolaryngologist, or a licensed physician if no otolaryngologist is available, before dispensing a hearing instrument if the licensee determines, through inquiry, actual observation, or review of any other available information concerning the prospective user, that the prospective user has any of the conditions related to warnings found in the regulations of the federal Food and Drug Administration, 21 C.F.R. 801.422, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2025.

Laws 2025, LB332, § 28.